Illinois, session 104th, SB1734.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 204 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/204)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-204)7    Sec. 204. Standard exemption. 8    (a) Allowance of exemption. In computing net income under 9this Act, there shall be allowed as an exemption the sum of the 10amounts determined under subsections (b), (c) and (d), 11multiplied by a fraction the numerator of which is the amount 12of the taxpayer's base income allocable to this State for the 13taxable year and the denominator of which is the taxpayer's 14total base income for the taxable year.15    (b) Basic amount. For the purpose of subsection (a) of 16this Section, except as provided by subsection (a) of Section 17205 and in this subsection, each taxpayer shall be allowed a 18basic amount of $1000, except that for corporations the basic 19amount shall be zero for tax years ending on or after December 2031, 2003, and for individuals the basic amount shall be:21        (1) for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 22    1998 and prior to December 31, 1999, $1,300;23        (2) for taxable years ending on or after December 31,   SB1734- 2 -LRB104 06481 HLH 16517 b1    1999 and prior to December 31, 2000, $1,650;2        (3) for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 3    2000 and prior to December 31, 2012, $2,000;4        (4) for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 5    2012 and prior to December 31, 2013, $2,050; 6        (5) for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 7    2013 and on or before December 31, 2022, $2,050 plus the 8    cost-of-living adjustment under subsection (d-5); 9        (6) for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 10    2023 and prior to December 31, 2024, $2,425; 11        (7) for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 12    2024 and on or before December 31, 2028, $2,050 plus the 13    cost-of-living adjustment under subsection (d-5). 14For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 1992, a 15taxpayer whose Illinois base income exceeds the basic amount 16and who is claimed as a dependent on another person's tax 17return under the Internal Revenue Code shall not be allowed 18any basic amount under this subsection.19    (c) Additional amount for individuals. In the case of an 20individual taxpayer, there shall be allowed for the purpose of 21subsection (a), in addition to the basic amount provided by 22subsection (b), an additional exemption equal to the basic 23amount for each exemption in excess of one allowable to such 24individual taxpayer for the taxable year under Section 151 of 25the Internal Revenue Code.26    (d) Additional exemptions for an individual taxpayer and   SB1734- 3 -LRB104 06481 HLH 16517 b1his or her spouse. In the case of an individual taxpayer and 2his or her spouse, he or she shall each be allowed additional 3exemptions as follows:4        (1) Additional exemption for taxpayer or spouse 65 5    years of age or older.6            (A) For taxpayer. An additional exemption of 7        $1,000 for the taxpayer if he or she has attained the 8        age of 65 before the end of the taxable year.9            (B) For spouse when a joint return is not filed. An 10        additional exemption of $1,000 for the spouse of the 11        taxpayer if a joint return is not made by the taxpayer 12        and his spouse, and if the spouse has attained the age 13        of 65 before the end of such taxable year, and, for the 14        calendar year in which the taxable year of the 15        taxpayer begins, has no gross income and is not the 16        dependent of another taxpayer.17        (2) Additional exemption for blindness of taxpayer or 18    spouse.19            (A) For taxpayer. An additional exemption of 20        $1,000 for the taxpayer if he or she is blind at the 21        end of the taxable year.22            (B) For spouse when a joint return is not filed. An 23        additional exemption of $1,000 for the spouse of the 24        taxpayer if a separate return is made by the taxpayer, 25        and if the spouse is blind and, for the calendar year 26        in which the taxable year of the taxpayer begins, has   SB1734- 4 -LRB104 06481 HLH 16517 b1        no gross income and is not the dependent of another 2        taxpayer. For purposes of this paragraph, the 3        determination of whether the spouse is blind shall be 4        made as of the end of the taxable year of the taxpayer; 5        except that if the spouse dies during such taxable 6        year such determination shall be made as of the time of 7        such death.8            (C) Blindness defined. For purposes of this 9        subsection, an individual is blind only if his or her 10        central visual acuity does not exceed 20/200 in the 11        better eye with correcting lenses, or if his or her 12        visual acuity is greater than 20/200 but is 13        accompanied by a limitation in the fields of vision 14        such that the widest diameter of the visual fields 15        subtends an angle no greater than 20 degrees.16    (d-5) Cost-of-living adjustment. For purposes of item (5) 17of subsection (b), the cost-of-living adjustment for any 18calendar year and for taxable years ending prior to the end of 19the subsequent calendar year is equal to $2,050 times the 20percentage (if any) by which: 21        (1) the Consumer Price Index for the preceding 22    calendar year, exceeds 23        (2) the Consumer Price Index for the calendar year 24    2011. 25    The Consumer Price Index for any calendar year is the 26average of the Consumer Price Index as of the close of the   SB1734- 5 -LRB104 06481 HLH 16517 b112-month period ending on August 31 of that calendar year. 2    The term "Consumer Price Index" means the last Consumer 3Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the United 4States Department of Labor or any successor agency. 5    If any cost-of-living adjustment is not a multiple of $25, 6that adjustment shall be rounded to the next lowest multiple 7of $25. 8    (e) Cross reference. See Article 3 for the manner of 9determining base income allocable to this State.10    (f) Application of Section 250. Section 250 does not apply 11to the amendments to this Section made by Public Act 90-613.12    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for 13taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, no 14taxpayer may claim an exemption under this Section if the 15taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the taxable year exceeds 16(i) $500,000, in the case of spouses filing a joint federal tax 17return or (ii) $250,000, in the case of all other taxpayers. 18(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.